Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB403.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 72.415 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of KRS 72.410 to 72.470, coroners and
deputy coroners shall have the full power and authority of peace officers in this
state, including the power of arrest and the authority to bear arms, and shall have
the power and authority to:
(a) Administer oaths;
(b) Enter upon public or private premises for the purpose of making
investigations;
(c) Seize evidence;
(d) Interrogate persons;
(e) Require the production of medical records, books, papers, documents, or other
evidence;
(f) Impound vehicles involved in vehicular deaths;
(g) Employ special investigators and photographers; and
(h) Expend funds for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of KRS 72.410 to
72.470.
The fiscal court or urban-county government shall pay all reasonable expenses
incurred by the coroner and his deputy in carrying out his responsibilities under the
provisions of KRS 72.410 to 72.470.
(2) (a) 1. No person shall be eligible to hold the office of deputy coroner unless he
holds a high school diploma or its recognized equivalent. Every deputy
coroner, other than a licensed physician, shall be required as a condition
of office to take during every calendar year he or she is in office the
training course of at least eighteen (18) hours provided by the
Department of Criminal Justice Training or other courses approved by
Page 1 of 4
BR152200.100 - 1522 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1522
the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet after having completed the basic
training course the first year of employment. The training course shall
include material developed by the cabinet and approved by the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services on the human immunodeficiency virus
infection and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. The material shall
include information on known modes of transmission and methods of
controlling and preventing these diseases with an emphasis on
appropriate behavior and attitude change.
2. Within three (3) years of initially assuming office, every deputy coroner
shall be required as a condition of office to take a course of at least four
(4) hours provided by the Department of Criminal Justice Training that
shall include instruction on the grieving process and best practices for
providing a notice of death to a spouse or next of kin and may include
instruction on other similar topics, as set out in KRS 64.185(4)(b). A
deputy coroner that has completed the course shall not be required to
retake the course.
(b) 1. Any deputy coroner subject to the training requirements of paragraph (a)
of this subsection who fails to complete the mandated training shall be
ineligible to perform the duties of deputy coroner, and may be
terminated by the coroner. The coroner shall make written notification
of the deputy coroner's ineligibility to perform his or her duties to the
deputy coroner and to the fiscal court or the legislative body of the
consolidated local government, charter county government, urban-
county government, or unified local government.
2. The commissioner of the Department of Criminal Justice Training, or
the commissioner's designee, may grant the deputy coroner an
extension of no more than one hundred eighty (180) days in which to
Page 2 of 4
BR152200.100 - 1522 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1522
complete the training requirements of this subsection if there are
extenuating circumstances beyond the control of the deputy coroner
that prevent that individual from completing the training during the
required time period. If the deputy coroner is unable to complete the
training due to an injury or illness that prevents that individual from
performing the duties of the deputy coroner, the one hundred eighty
day (180) extension shall begin on the date that the deputy coroner
resumes performing the duties of the deputy coroner. Any deputy
coroner who fails to successfully complete the training within the time
period granted by the extension shall be subject to the consequences
set out in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.
[2. The deputy coroner shall regain his or her eligibility upon successful
recompletion of the initial basic training course referenced in KRS
64.185(4), which shall be evidenced by written certification provided by
the Department of Criminal Justice Training to the coroner. Upon
receipt of the certification, the coroner shall make written notification of
the reinstatement of eligibility to the deputy coroner and to the fiscal
court or the legislative body of the consolidated local government,
charter county government, urban-county government, or unified local
government.
3. The compensation of a deputy coroner who becomes ineligible to
perform his or her duties under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall
be modified as follows:
a. From the coroner's written notification of ineligibility until the
deputy coroner begins the basic training course mandated by
subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, the deputy coroner shall receive
no compensation;
Page 3 of 4
BR152200.100 - 1522 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1522
b. From the first day that the deputy coroner begins the basic training
course mandated by subparagraph 2. of this paragraph until written
notification of course outcome is received by the coroner, the
deputy coroner shall be compensated at his or her previously
established rate of compensation;
c. If the deputy coroner fails the basic training course mandated by
subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, the deputy coroner shall receive
no compensation from the date of receipt of notification of failure
from Department of Criminal Justice Training to the coroner until
the deputy coroner begins anew the basic training course mandated
by subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, at which time the deputy
coroner shall be compensated at his or her previously established
rate of compensation; and
d. If the deputy coroner successfully completes the basic training
course mandated by subparagraph 2. of this paragraph as
evidenced by written certification provided by the Department of
Criminal Justice Training to the coroner, the deputy coroner shall
receive compensation as is normally determined for deputy
coroners pursuant to statute.]
Page 4 of 4
BR152200.100 - 1522 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:31 PM Jacketed